src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON l20_6 ! vissur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:sur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:san	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:sum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:s Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>sum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:s Pos_Def	;
 +A:s Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_7 ! dólgabýttur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:tur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:tan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:tum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:t Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:t Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:t Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>tum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:t Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:t Pos_Def	;
 +A:t Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l21 ! fastur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl21 ;
LEXICON zl21 ! fastur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 Sg_Neu3_Uuml ;
 Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 Pos_Def2	  ;
 Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l22 ! klæddur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl22 ;
LEXICON zl22 ! klæddur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ddur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ddan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ; 
 :dd Pl_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum  # ;
 :dd Sg_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^ØUML%>dd 	 # ;
 :dd Pl_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 :dd Pl_Neu1 ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ddum	 # ;
 :dd Pos_Def3	  ;
 :dd Pos_Def	  ;
 :dd Comp_Ari	  ;
 
LEXICON l22_2 ! staddur = Riggar!
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl22_2 ;
LEXICON zl22_2 ! staddur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>addur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>addan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>øddum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>addum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ads	 # ; 
 :add Pl_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>øddum  # ;
 :add Sg_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ødd 	 # ;
 :add Pl_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>øddum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>att	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>att	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>øddum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>addum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ads	 # ;
 :add Pl_Neu1 ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>øddum	 # ;
 :add Pos_Def3	  ;
 :add Pos_Def	  ;
 :add Comp_Ari	  ;
 
LEXICON l23 ! rættur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl23 ;
LEXICON zl23 ! rættur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ttur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ttan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ttum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ts	 # ; 
 :tt Pl_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum  # ;
 :tt Sg_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^ØUML%>tt 	 # ;
 :tt Pl_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ttum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ts	 # ;
 :tt Pl_Neu1 ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^ØUML%>ttum	 # ;
 :tt Pos_Def3	  ;
 :tt Pos_Def 	  ;
 :tt Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l23_2 ! brattur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl23_2 ;
LEXICON zl23_2 ! brattur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ttur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ttan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ttum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ts	 # ; 
 :tt Pl_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ttum  # ;
 :tt Sg_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>tt 	 # ;
 :tt Pl_Fem1 ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ttum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ttum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ts	 # ;
 :tt Pl_Neu1 ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ttum	 # ;
 :tt Pos_Def3	  ;
 :tt Pos_Def 	  ;
 :tt Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l24/25
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
l24 ;
l25 ;

LEXICON l24 ! frískur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl24 ;
LEXICON zl24 ! frískur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Sg_Msc1  ;
 Pl_Msc2  ;
 Sg_Fem2  ;
 Pl_Fem2  ;
 Sg_Neu1  ;
 Pl_Neu2  ;
 Pos_Def  ;
 Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l25 ! danskur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl25 ;
LEXICON zl25 ! danskur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 Pos_Def2 	  ;
 Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l26 ! vakin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl26 ;
LEXICON zl26 ! vakin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :^EPH a_m_sg_n_null    ;
 :^EPH a_non_umlaut_obl ;
 :^EPH a_umlaut         ;
 :^EPH adj_def          ;
 :^EPH Comp_Ari 		;

!LEXICON l26_2 ! flogin
!+A: zl26_2 ;
LEXICON zl26_2 ! flogin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>in  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>nan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ins # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>nir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>nar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>in  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>nari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>in  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>in  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na	  # ;
 :%>n 	Pos_Def  			;
 :%>n 	Comp_Ari 		;

LEXICON l27 ! heiðin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl27 ;
LEXICON zl27 ! heiðin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ðin   # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>dnan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dnum  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðins  # ;
 :d Pl_Msc3 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ðin	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>dna   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dnari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>dnar  # ;
 :d Pl_Fem3 ; 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ðið	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ðið	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dnum   # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðins   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ðin	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ðin    # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dnum   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>dna	 # ;
 :dn Pos_Def  ;
 :dn Comp_Ari ;


LEXICON l28 ! mikil 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl28 ;
LEXICON zl28 ! mikil 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :il a_m_sg_n_null ;
 :il msgpl ;
 :il a_f_sg_n_null ;
 :il fsgpl ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ið	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ið	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ils	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>il	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>il 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>lum	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>la	 # ;
 :l Pos_Def 	;
 :l Comp_Ari 	;
  
LEXICON l28_2 ! lítil
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:il a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A:il msgpl ;
 +A:il a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A:il fsgpl ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ið	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ið	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ils	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>il	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>il 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>lum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>la	 # ;
 +A:l Pos_Def 	;

LEXICON MINNI
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:minn CI 	 ;
 +A:min SRi 	 ;

LEXICON l29 ! vakur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl29 ;

LEXICON zl29
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 	# ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ran	 	# ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>rum # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>urs	 	# ;
 :r Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ra 	 	# ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>rari 		# ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar  		# ;
 :r Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>urt	 	# ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>urt	 	# ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>rum # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>urs	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>ur 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>rum # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 	# ;
 :r Pos_Def2 ;
 :r Comp_Ari ; 
 
LEXICON l30 ! tepur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A: a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A:  msgpl ;
 +A:  a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A:  fsgpl ;
 +A:  nsgpl ;
 +A:^EPH Pos_Def ;
 +A:^EPH Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l31 ! trupul
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A:a_m_sg_n_null ;
 +A:msgpl ;
 +A:a_f_sg_n_null ;
 +A:fsgpl ;
 +A:nsgpl ;
 +A:^EPH Pos_Def ;
 +A:^EPH Comp_Ari ;
