src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Shortadjectives
vakur+CmpNP/None:vak l29 ;
bitur+CmpNP/None:bitur l30 ;
digur+CmpNP/None:digur l30 ;
vitur+CmpNP/None:vitur l30 ;
LEXICON Adjectives
brasilskur:brasilsk l25 ;
vulkanskur:vulka3nsk l25 ; ! no umlaut
lítil: MINNI ;
tepur+CmpNP/None:tepur l30 ;
trupul:trupul l31 ;
árvissur:árvis l20_6 ;
dólgabýttur:dólgabýt l20_7 ;
óvissur:óvis l20_6 ;
sigursvissur:sigursvis l20_6 ;
tíðarvissur:tíðarvis l20_6 ;
vissur:vis l20_6 ;
ymissur:ymis l20_6 ;
biksvartur:biksvart l21 ;
dagfastur:dag#fast l21 ;
greytsvartur:greytsvart l21 ;
kjálkasvartur:kjálkasvart l21 ;
landfastur:land#fast l21 ;
ramsaltur:ramsalt l21 ;
skallasvartur:skallasvart l21 ;
stovnfastur:stovn#fast l21 ;
vongsvartur:vongsvart l21 ;
burtursmæddur:burtursmæ l22 ;
einstaddur:einst l22_2 ;
frumstaddur:frumst l22_2 ;
gonguklæddur:gonguklæ l22 ;
kavaklæddur:kavaklæ l22 ;
kransstaddur:kransst l22_2 ;
nærstaddur:nærst l22_2 ;
reiðarklæddur:reiðarklæ l22 ;
sorgarklæddur:sorgarklæ l22 ;
undanstaddur:undanst l22_2 ;
vásaklæddur:vásaklæ l22 ;
barðrættur:barðræ l23 ;
brattur:bra l23_2 ;
bringubrattur:bringubra l23_2 ;
dúnlættur:dúnlæ l23 ;
ennisbrattur:ennisbra l23_2 ;
ennisfattur:ennisfa l23_2 ;
fattur:fa l23_2 ;
fløskutættur:fløskutæ l23 ;
gásatættur:gásatæ l23 ;
huglættur:huglæ l23 ;
høvuðfattur:høvuðfa l23_2 ;
lendafattur:lendafa l23_2 ;
linjurættur:linjuræ l23 ;
munnlættur:munnlæ l23 ;
ótættur:ótæ l23 ;
ryggjarfattur:ryggjarfa l23_2 ;
stavrættur:stavræ l23 ;
tumlafattur:tumlafa l23_2 ;
vatnrættur:vatnræ l23 ;
veggbrattur:veggbra l23_2 ;
kokbrattur:kokbra l23_2 ;
indiskur:indisk l24 ;
sleiskur:sleisk l24 ;
aldanskur:aldansk l25 ;
amerikanskur:amerikansk l25 ;
vietnamesiskur:vietnamesisk l25 ;
franskur:fransk l25 ;
japanskur:japa2nsk l25 ;
ramdanskur:ramdansk l25 ;
vandur:vand l25 ;
bulvirkin:bulvirkin l26 ;
fullkomin:fullkomin l26 ;
heimavaksin:heimavaksin l26 ;
kávalátin:kávalátin l26 ;
maskinbundin:maskinbundin l26 ;
óráðtøkin:óráðtøkin l26 ;
skellopin:skellopin l26 ;
svalin:svalin l26 ;
varsin:varsin l26 ;
ballsnoðin:ball#sno l27 ;
eyðbiðin:eyð#bi l27 ;
góðlíðin:góð#lí l27 ;
hálvoyðin:hálv#oy l27 ;
kjafttroðin:kjaft#tro l27 ;
lýðin:lý l27 ;
ovstaðin:ov#sta l27 ;
óstaðin:ó#sta l27 ;
staðin:sta l27 ;
blóðmikil:blóð#mik l28 ;
búklítil:búk#lít l28_2 ;
elapinkulítil:elapinku#lít l28_2 ;
evurspinkulítil:evurspinku#lít l28_2 ;
eydnismikil:eydnis#mik l28 ;
framlítil:fram#lít l28_2 ;
gávumikil:gávu#mik l28 ;
gróðrarlítil:gróðrar#lít l28_2 ;
haturmikil:hatur#mik l28 ;
hendingalítil:hendinga#lít l28_2 ;
kenslumikil:kenslu#mik l28 ;
limalítil:lima#lít l28_2 ;
lostamikil:losta#mik l28 ;
møðumikil:møðu#mik l28 ;
orðalítil:orða#lít l28_2 ;
ráðamikil:ráða#mik l28 ;
skilalítil:skila#lít l28_2 ;
sorgarmikil:sorgar#mik l28 ;
vandamikil:vanda#mik l28 ;
viðlítil:við#lít l28_2 ;
alfagur:alfag l29 ;
bráðvakur:bráðvak l29 ;
dýrdarfagur:dýrdarfag l29 ;
lagvakur:lagvak l29 ;
ljóðfagur:ljóðfag l29 ;
ljómvakur:ljómvak l29 ;
óvakur:óvak l29 ;
undurvakur:undurvak l29 ;
yndisfagur:yndisfag l29 ;
alvitur:alvitur l30 ;
gørvitur:gørvitur l30 ;
snævur:snævur l30 ;
trævetur:trævetur l30 ;
tvævetur:tvævetur l30 ;
døpul:døpul l31 ;
brynjuklæddur:brynjuklæ l22 ;
dreivstaddur:dreivst l22_2 ;
gerandisklæddur:gerandisklæ l22 ;
heilaskaddur:heilask l22_2 ;
miðstaddur:miðst l22_2 ;
prestklæddur:prestklæ l22 ;
snúðurstaddur:snúðurst l22_2 ;
vaðmalsklæddur:vaðmalsklæ l22 ;
útstaddur:útst l22_2 ;
ríkisdanskur:ríkisdansk l24/25 ;
akseptabul:akseptabul l31 ;
gøtudanskur:gøtudansk l25 ;
libanskur:libansk l24/25 ;
albanskur:albansk l24/25 ;
muhamedanskur:muhamedansk l24/25 ;
koreanskur:koreansk l24/25 ;
julianskur:juliansk l24/25 ;
gregorianskur:gregoriansk l24/25 ;
manskur:mansk l24/25 ;
forngermanskur:forn#germansk l24/25 ;
borin:borin l26 ;
atferðartrupul:at#ferðar#trupul l31 ;
samgermanskur:sam#germansk l24/25 ;
útlagstur:út#lagst l21 ;
útboðin:út#bo l27 ;
namibiskur:namibisk l24 ;
teleologiskur:teleologisk l24 ;
somaliskur:somalisk l24 ;
disharmoniskur:disharmonisk l24 ;
divinatoriskur:divinatorisk l24 ;
psykofysiskur:psykofysisk l24 ;
antisemitiskur:antisemitisk l24 ;
trotskistiskur:trotskistisk l24 ;
